Maine, session 132, LD811.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 8 MRSA §1206, sub-§2-A is enacted to read:
2-A. Municipal approval required; public hearing; appeal. In addition to the
eligibility requirements in subsection 2, an applicant shall request and must receive
approval from the municipal officers of the municipality in which a sports wagering facility
is to be physically located.
A. The municipal officers of the municipality must hold a public hearing regarding the
operation of a sports wagering facility at a physical location within that municipality
before approving or denying the request.
B. In approving or denying the request, the municipal officers shall indicate the reasons
for the municipal officers' decision and provide a written copy of the decision to the
applicant and to the director.
C. An applicant aggrieved by the decision of the municipal officers under this
subsection may appeal to the director within 15 days of the receipt of the written
decision of the municipal officers under paragraph B. The director shall hold a public
hearing in the municipality where the sports wagering facility is to be physically
located. In acting on such an appeal, the director may consider all licensure
requirements, including the requirements of the applicant’s underlying license, and
findings referred to in the municipal officers’ written decision. The director may issue
a license only if the director finds by clear and convincing evidence that the denial
decision was without justifiable cause.
If a sports wagering facility is to be physically located in an unincorporated place, the
applicant shall request and must receive approval under this subsection from the county
commissioners of the county in which the sports wagering facility is to be physically
located.
Sec. 2. 8 MRSA §1206, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2023, c. 577, §2, is further
amended to read:
5. Term of license. Except as provided in subsection 6, a license granted or renewed
under this section prior to September 1, 2024 is valid for 4 years and a license granted or
renewed under this section on or after September 1, 2024 is valid for one year unless sooner
revoked by the director or the commissioner under section 1205. The failure of a facility
sports wagering licensee to maintain its underlying off-track betting license voids the
facility sports wagering license. A facility sports wagering license is valid only at the
facility sports wagering licensee's municipally approved physical location.